District of Columbia statutes.
29-1206.12

Pleading.

In a derivative action to enforce a right of a statutory trust, the complaint shall state with particularity the:

(1)

Date and content of the plaintiff’s demand and the trustees’ response to the demand; or

(2)

Reason the demand should be excused as futile.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(7)(G), 59 DCR 13171

History

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes